District of Columbia statutes.
2-593

Powers and duties of the Open Government Office.

(a)

The Open Government Office shall:

(1)

Report annually, on or before February 1, on its activities, including recommendations for changes in the law;

(2)

Issue advisory opinions to public bodies on compliance with subchapter IV of this chapter;

(3)

Provide training to public bodies, officials, and employees related to subchapter IV of this chapter; and

(4)

Issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter and subchapter IV of this chapter.

(b)

The Open Government Office may bring suit to enforce § 2-579.

(c)

The Open Government Office may issue advisory opinions on implementation of subchapter II of this chapter.

Oct. 21, 1968, Pub. L. 90-614, title IV, § 503
as added Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-350, § 2, 58 DCR 734